Washington statutes.
RCW 19.270.040

Unlawful activities—Installation or execution of software component—Deceptive misrepresentation.

It is unlawful for a person who is not an owner or operator to do any of the following with regard to the owner or operator's computer:

(1) Induce an owner or operator to install a computer software component onto the computer by deceptively misrepresenting the extent to which installing the software is necessary for maintenance, update, or repair of the computer or computer software, for security or privacy reasons, for the proper operation of the computer, in order to open, view, or play a particular type of content; or

(2) Induce an owner or operator to install a computer software component onto the computer by displaying a pop-up, web page, or other message that deceptively misrepresents the source of the message; or

(3) Deceptively cause the execution on the computer of a computer software component that causes the owner or operator to use the component in a manner that violates any other provision of this section.

[ 2008 c 66 s 3; 2005 c 500 s 4.]